      "identifier" : [
         "8_06854_5"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "\"7ý -77- À ý1î rco -N'",
         "Owner S1WP41ý -7e zz, yi»g,.::--to the:Ae 4y MEN: -HOR 'RA -SES, ff re poiiit:;ià ra to6u, suprmacy, and soon the wor-1à,ýwî» hear ûfthe- u11ànt]ý,and Sýýzrý d ou Cana\" -If ý,N«po1éon ý5 be diettiýni truie ýthat arm-y fighw ion jài teüt muprpiy then eqoânyJýýjant àsthe ainmuniti imin ýwwh' ýànadian iWheat.àté' 4h gmde floiü. The,,suele àd (wi ëf 4 and mùk « figW envW 4J;ýoaà,ý',àià ifié iùl',ex,.ýtrade' SES )FL \u003cft 1'to' P,ùý-C b îbt fjrüe, rai* ôf zae *ýemÉ4, b\"t, , ý1e r È",
         "THE CANADIAN WAR PATRIOTL5M UNION VICTORY PUBLLSHED AT 32 CHURCH ST, TORONTO Written and Edited Devoted Entimly to Cireulated Belaw Cost. Withoft R«muner\u0026Uon Propaganda for the War All Pro:àts for War Fwdà Fifth Number January 30th, 1915 Five Cents DEDICATED To the women who, having magnlfled love and dutjoý that thelr countrys honour may be exalted, await the dread Issue with sublime courage; and, by thoir sacrifice forthe Empl Inspire thelr representatives In the field, and cet en example to ail who are not prIvlleged to bear arme. Tl U DOCTORS' WIVES AS it elyler struck you that you lt is annoying sometimes to be called are eloser to the war than any up in the middle of the night-not to other elain of ý Cinadian women\u003e Içnow a good night's rest for weeks at evý*,,,peehaps,. thèse whose son% have a time. It is Mecially annoying when gone, to, . \u003e the front? people call whose imagination is great- h âbaâd knows more of what erthan their ailment. But their excess thisýwRr means than any of his friends ir. taken with the others' neeessity, and -Ilis brother doctors excepte\u0026 What the d'octor doesn't complain and you your husbandmay -be to the local reali- don't complain. Why 1 Because he- zation of this war's sufferings, you are hind all his wollk, and long journeys, aW---or y-ou may be. and all your waiting, which is also There is open te you a peculiarly work, there is the sense of sel-vice effective form. of ministry. Thà is an rendered, of pain alleviated, of ý life appeal to you to intenéýy yaur înti- given, and mortality preserved. matetoueh with the realities of the Aiid now the war has come to en- war so that it may spread to those large the burden and to eloud the around you, te the deepening of the future. What was the first thrilling only. patriotism wortli while-the response it evoked? It wasnt the Gor- patriotixm ýhàt thrives on ever-reeur- ernment môving in state at Ottawa, ring saoriflce. calling for meni It was the Red Groso4 The, doator is bettier ac U\u0026Inted with whieh isthe doetors' b\u0026àge of war, the ý'tha mot pie c - nurses' sign of never-ending, Moray. gri1aý n ' t.,Peci . saya noth ing, ïbouf it to the fflerality. of folk, the potential..redemption of brutality, but sometimes he talka - to. \"u. , Thât the flame which -bide the doctbro' ùa- miglit he 1 Uiiw Aé ý a lýéagoù -for not triotism burn even au the flre Whlâ boffiering. you -With thé' P \u003e -01. e belongs to the cross that la carried by War thàtis going to belelt more'and handu that never dip into the otrêamï-. mué'in alLour hearts. But yon'ake not inK blood tlat th lt. ýýîh 1 ey may uve of at Izi-od Tour hn-Wband S ».tof F\u0026_ the mon Who die on the field thFI't kind, -here is everlasti -rest and",
         "2 THE CANADIAN WAR. glory. But for the wounded--àh 1 ple every-where think the same things there is the blessedness of the arts aboutthe -war-it is the oüWý._@afe as- which your husband practises for the surante thatthey will unfailingly ýô healing of, his fellows and yours and the sarne things, make the same sacri- ours. It. is the doctor at the front who flees during the war, and achieve the arrests the diabolic hand of war. It same splendors' _when, the battle-flags is the dmtor at home who, more than are furled. any other, may keep lambent the patri- The editors hope thât The Canadian otie flame. Your partnership with him, War will give you the opportunity to therefore, endows you with the best look at the waiting-room. downstairs opportunity to fbe a conductor of what ftom perhaps a new point of view. he is and what he knows an(j what he You have not hitherto thonght of it ai; sees te the country in which he serves. a place in which yoù might further ý the ý,objeets for whieh\u003e in your scanty Probably the Mrst AppeaL leisuré,yon p1ýt forth . unselflsh effort- The polïtieians who controi the ma- éhurèli and social affairsfor example. ehinery of nations, and make with it But this war is a màtter in whieh the havoc af bloody war, can never be everybody who comes to, the doctor is equal to the emergencies their policies vitally interested, and everylbody they create. This is theAirst great 'war in know is as vita;lly interested as you and history in which the power of women we, and ail whose dear ones have en- is recognized in every department of listed for the treneffies areinterested. itseonduet, ex-eept in the actual firing The Canadian War is the most ouhable.. of the guns. «Women are doing ManY and the most serviceable thing you can things, on which the sustenance of put into the waiting-room, and about patriotism depends, thingo whieh it is which, you may usefully indace conver- quite impossible for men to perform. satfon. Their sublime sacrifice. in private en- duranee, and in pu-blïe toil, has been Bee the Bookuller. dimly pereelved %y the editors of The Then there are thebook-stéreà, wh\u0026e- Canadian War, whieh accounts for the the proprietors and clerks get into the dedication on the preceding page. habit of lookîng at printed mattéÊ asý Wliat women may do for Canadas part so, much printed matter-just that anà,ý in the war is ouly te be measured -by nOthing more- A. boôk-sellet Cannot their will and their skill, both of whieh read everything that comes te him are linmeasurable, in presence of an im- Bâle, - ThOugh bc mAkeg his living alt meagurable neeessity. the business he sometimes àighs SùlQ-ýý mons sigh about the making of manY' This is probably the fint time an boo)rW. . . - e .1 appeal has been written for the wives Yon will probably find that the book- -of aR Canadian doetors, in eonnection sellers-in tôen have had copies of Thé with a national and imperial emer- Cauzdian War Whieh they , have gency, or any emergency.. It is an thrust in theýbaükground, though theY afflal for your co-fflr\u0026tion on any of have put 'foreigh importations in the the lines W'hieh a perusal of this paper forefront. will atrike yon as most ouitable for the The, bookseller is vi . tally intèreded t ime:you un equeze inte this service. in What in i» ne ORnadiau Wàr for . Pirit of all, the editors vC feel bimiWf,'and for everybody Éhé coules -thankful to know tbat eaeh week they te his stffl.' JýIready fieývéýal havé, May, the profit tô à connt on your sympathetic reàd ôgeÎ-ed to sell, it, givmg lhg ý of whaf they are sending p«. in local *ar IùÜd., ThéY Uvi eolufiteèr. tbe hQpe thât it wM reach aIl the pe*ý ed tu tush îtýýwhich is More One ble all over, thé Dvînfidou, te the en\u0026 writes thàtIe ýhoýý to sêll,ïýMar;\u0026. that patriotismand union may bc nourà Speaking to, the blàokàeUer wM 14115 lahed, ýàzd th-é emsuranee ý of ýict617 to èPreîd the doetor\"S fitjI#'ýenêý- O'h dotibW sure. It-is vital that peô- loeal opinion about the war.",
         "THE CANADIAN WAR. Thepoint of these suggestions is that other profession-except, perfiaps, the if they are follawed many people will lawyers, whose business . is publie kno-w about The Canadian War, and Fdvomwy. will buy it, and in their turn will help The doctor comes home tired, cold, to spread the flame which it ý-as heavy with the endless toil, and what founded to, kindle and to extend. he sometimes feels to be the endless in- Other forma of coýoperation wiR o,ýcur adequacy of hi6 power to keep paee to, you as soon as you think ov-3r the with thenewest discoveries of the most principal workerg in the patriotic, or- wonderful science in the world. There ganîzations around you. are so few people with whoin bc can Especially the Country. digeuss his work that he lives a life But, after all, it is because you are within a life. But the war, which seems only likely to add to his burdens nearest the doetor that we appeal fur and to yours-may furnish new ave- your coýoperation and for your advice. nues of friendlinesss through the doc- This, we think, applies especially to tors insight into what is going on be- those, who live in the country. 8\"me- hind the trench\u00269 and in the hospitals. times, when you talk things, over, there is a half-sad regret that you continue Conies Ao Quiet Dfinister. to live in the country, because yon are The only way to defeat the war as a away from saine of the Iarger things destroyer of nervous power is to be- whieU make city life so attractive for come concerned in aspects of it whieh most of us. The great ni ' ajority of lift you out of yourself. Knitting Canadian doctors' wives have lived at soeks for the soldiers is a nohle actW some time in the city, ity. Stripping bandages for the Ue writer of this knows the appar- wounded touches the heart, and sets ent limitations of the country. But the imagination to work. the other side ifi worthy of ý high re- But these things cannot occupy all membrance durin'g t his war period, your thought. The Canadian War especially by the doctor and the doc- comes onee a week as a quiet minister tor's wile. The doctor drives about of the-patriotism which we all want to the country, he meets every :class of magnify. If the editors, by being al- the people, he knows what they are lowed to come- to you and to those thinking, better than: any other man with whom you contact, can render a knows it. service, however small-as they be- 'Pecause of that, and beeaulse his lieve they can-they will bc rewarded, profession ean only be followed by a eRpecially as they have been told that raan with a bright, deep, quick mind, not one in fifty of the doctom' wives the doctors have provided a larger to whom it goes will answe this ap- proportion of publie men than any peal-which, they do not believe, 09\"TING X»LOY1CMý ÀUX YOUR BOOUELLYM If ho la pushing \"T'heC4tà\u0026dlan War.\" It Is -Row \"The Canadian WOX\" EWpg. 9,00d lus1ness and gond patriotiEkni to create and, enlarge the deman\u0026 An employer who could do nothing hlm- sel£ sent a dowuýand-eit gentiemanlv man to PATRI(MO BOCRTY MM EU. thé omob et 'wrhe ýCan\u0026d1aa War,\" h*ping he 0âmeltIng toîlô. Oh alze-U-D lie 1 At your patriotie 1 meetings, oonceru, waî Iméd tweùty,.dve dontà for'\u0026 lunch and lunct- glyen a Ochance to 15PIL the paper., In the ar ebns--wherever two or three are gath- ered togothèr--Wl \"The Canadlin W#x\" and temoon \u003e earned a dollar and a half- 56e talré siiboorlDtions. Copies and advertiaing ehý\u0026t ýow ýu4scrIptIon. la doingt matter supplied. epresd the flame and make Ilfty per cent. prodt, for your local tandfi. A «ame to aproud-thst lu whitt Th*ý Onna- WrIte your requlremente to, 82 Chureh StreeL 'dmà War le lotattýed'to b\u0026 So pasè lt:on-, We dont In Rist on eu\u0026 with order. Moet of tind tWI theffler 'porion to do Ilkowlae. all. we want to get In toueh wlth, you.",
         "PIIIFUL STATE OF FRANCE AND BELGIUIW Doctor Who Comes from the Front Tella of the Appalling Needs. for. Buooor of Fighting. Mon and Those Who Rave Been Driven from Home. RE first living aeeounts of what out homes, and, the oold rains falling the war lust of Germany has in four million people: are witliéni Oui-' flieted on the peoples who have fieient elothing and the winier setting suffered from its invasions have in; seven million people are hungry, been heard in Canada ftom Dr. and little or no food to, be had. Brown-Landone, who has been speak- Fields of wheat, barley and rye have ing to Canadian Clubs and other or- been consumed or burned; erops of ganizations in Toronto and elsewhere. beet mots, sprouts and other edibles It is impossible no.w to give his state- have been eaten or destroyed'; no ments in anything like fulness. They bread, no flour, no meat, no milk; only have- thrilled the audienees who have dried peas and beau and often Do heard them. They compel the least means of cooking them. sensitive to realïze how vast is the de- The area over-run by the pres-ent mand for Canadians to, aid the suffer- war in France almOst equals thât de- ing, partly in thanksgiving that vastated in Belgium, Fields in n:orth- -though our own -freedom is threatened eastern France have not been eom- we have been spared all the real horý pletely burned and devastated as, have rors of war. Here are a few of the the £arma and fields of Belgium, but evidenees of the price that is being at least five millions of her people have Paid for German militarism in territory been driven from their homes; for where the Canadian armies must twelve weeks (battles havebeen fought operate \u003e- over her lands; eities have been batter- MMons are Hungry. ed and burnt and rendered uftin- Bruges, Brussels and Ghent are habitable. vaeated by the population and 00- Nouses are Fired. cupied by the enemy; Ostend has been Lillie, Amiens, Beauvais, Leon, ghelled; many cd the 'buildings of Rheims, Chalons, Meiieres, eaeh ,Malines, Seraing, Tournai, Alost, Mons, centers of industry, have had their Chaleroi, Courtrai, Liege and Louvain factories shelled and their shopade- are in ashes; they have not homes even stroyed; their buildings have been forn for a quarter of their previous popula. down or burned; their eathedrals tion. In Termonde, whieh on July stormed, their population fbrêed from 23rd, 1914, had a population of forty their homes, compelled to flee to other thousand, there are now only twenty departments of Pranee. buîldb4p standing. 1 Several millions of her people have- And in the country there are no wandered to other. Portions of the homes. Practioally every acre whieh country to be cared for by the already was under. eultivation from the east of bni-doned 7rench nation. Belgiùm to the west, and from the Do not imagine that these women and north to the ooùth, has been devastat- chil.dren areproperly housed and pro- .ed; enly thetinieat a trip near HolIand Perly elothed. Olten the left their and the tîniee strip near Ostend'h\"e homes with but a momentls notice. 1 esciped deâtruetiom. For mile and have seen women and children \u003e who miles there \u0026te no farm houseo intact; were forced from their burning- homes the fleMs a\" 'black'; crops have been at all hours of îhe iiiiht and e#rly ëononmed er îburned to the ground; mornine Often the hoim *wé: \u0026ed three millions or more people are with- liefore thoy'wen awskene\u0026",
         "THE CANADIAN WAH. There. was no tîme in whieh to grab huildred thousaud Germans wounded in clothing, m time for anything except that country. These are being taken to save themselves. Thus they often care of side by side with the English, journeyed, hundreds -in groups travel- Prench and Belgians. ling along the country highways with- As the extensive flghting has taken out food and without sufficient cloth- place during the forced retreat of the ing, 1 have seen hundreds wandering Germans, the wounded French have thus, clad only in the clothes in which 1)een left on their own battlefields and they have ibeen sleeping. I have seen not behind the German lines; the Ger- au entre hospital with its wounded mans thus have few wounded to care ordered, on thirty minutes' notice, to for, while the French have almost all take a train for the south. their own wounded and most of the Not only is southern and western English and most of the Belgian, as France trying to house these five mil- well as thousands of the German lion French women and children wounded. driven from their homes in the north- The inost conservative estimate which east, but she is, also finding homes for 1 am able to obtain to-day is that there -the million Belgian refugees who fled are at least flve hundred thousand into France. French wounded alone in France, not There are not vacant homes in which counting the Belgians, the English and these French and Belgian refugees can the Germans. be housed. It is not an easy problem to lqo Means of Transportation. furnish homes on a moment's notice for England would willingly take eare of a population greater than that of the .entire city of New York and Pitts- her own wounded if she could get them burg and Boston, combined. tû England, she woi-tld willingly take the Belgian wounded there; -but they Germans Leave Their Wounded. cannot be transferred acrosig the chan- There are no workmen to build ne-w nel. Not only are many too seriously dvýe1Hngs. The women are occupied. wounded to be transferred, but more From Brittanny to Marseilles they are important still is the fact that trans- carrying on the work of a nation of ports cannot be had. They are neéded forty millions of people, Imking after to eàrry food and jimmunition for those the affairs of their families, a:ttending ir the trenches. to their little ones, and caring for the Thousands upon thousands -of greatest number of wo.unded the world French, Belgian, German and English had ever kno-wn to be congregated on wounded are left in the northern .the soil of anyone nation. regions bmause there are no means of France is the Hospital of Europe. transportation, no possibility of get- Publîe buildings, hotels, private homes, ting them even as far south as Paris. even cottages are converted into hospi- Do you now understand why there tals. France has not only her own are women and children in Praneewho wounded, she has also the Belgian are still without homest Five miMon ,wounded, the English wýounded, and French women aud children from one hundred thousand wounded Ger- northeastern France to 'bc honsedi cae Mans. million Belgian refugees seeking some The Germans in retreating have place in whieh to sloop; and thouzands given their attention to their big guns, upon thousands of wounded soldiers- to their ammunition, to their supplies perhaýps hundreds of thousands Who and the German wounded have for this must be given beds and eared for. Ireason been loft behind on the battle- And the num1ber of the wounded 18 field,-thousands upon thousands of influitely greater than we have b-ýen allowed to knaw; Germany li secretly f!rom French and English hiding her losseu; so in France. One hoopital investigators in France Indi- waits long In France te learn iyVen eate 'eAt there are at lesigt one vagnoly -of the killed alid *ô;in\u0026d",
         "THE CASADIAN WAR. who have fallen in engagementa weeks ing upon import d tood producte., 4ously. jýngla4dý is Abe enly Rente we must. realize that,,any.:do,- country at war that promptly publiehes mand for help now is not a demand for lier - loues. a \"contribution to be- finishec1 with thé It -was generallyunderstood during d9pation, it is a demand for organized the last twé weèke in August that one work whioh must continue week after, hundreà and fifty thousand English week, month after manth as long as ývere eghtug. In fact, the nuýnber the need exists. was ouly ei.ghty thousand! England I appeal to you to help the- wounded lost twezLty-two thousand out of the soldiers, not, beeause Germany, Engf. eighty thousand, one man out of every land or France ahould not 'eare for four; and this loss was certainly not theirown, but be-cauzethçyça=otl It greater than ý the German losses and not is not a queetion of what France or of twice as great as the average French any other natien should do. It is a loss. How great the present losses are, question of what she un do. haw many - thousands upop thousands Do not say that the governments are arle killed andwounded we shall never meeting their own needs; no govern. know till long after the war is over. ment, no matter how rich, is able # .. Though France makes no appeal, 1 this time to provide the means of rç- mak'e an appeal to you for France; I lief necessary to meet the exeeptional make an appeal for her woýmen and conditions that exist. ehildren, and . 1 make an appeal Governments Cannot. for those French who are caring for The slaughter in this war is se mueh and feeding the hundreds ol thousands greater thau was expeeted, that France ef refugee ' Belgian women and children. -as well as all other nations, is unpre- Gamany WeU Supplied With Food. pared to tare . for the thousands upon And England; England'is housing thousands of wounded. and clothing and leeding thousands, Information has just reaehed me yes,,teýis-of thousands, who have found frOlu PhYsieians and nurses who have 'refuge there, as well as caring for the been upon the 'bàttlefield in north- hundreds of thousands of women and eastern France, and from other nurses children left' destituie by the enlist- and PhYsiPiuns wlio are serving in ment of a million men. One relief fund hospitals in Normandy -and 13riîtany alone amounts to more than eighteen and all oorroborate the -reports which ni we have been reeeiving oï the terrible i ilUon dollars, We need millions of suits of clothes conditions found there. -for old men and young boys; we need 1 appeal to you as men, as women, go millions Of suits of underwear; we need brothers of humanity to help in eoliget. millions of warm. dresses for women and ing every plece of white eloth, every 41ildren; we\"need all types of elothing; Piece Of' Cotton or linen, a pieee even iind we -need shoes, shoes, shoes. as small as a half handkerehief; 1 ap- . There is not ouly need nowbut there peal for these that they may be pre. ivill rbe need for many months, perhaps pared as dressings and bandages to. be ýfor a- year or two years to eome. 1 do used fer those lying with wûunds un- .,net aay this lightly or without due bound. If you had seen what I have seen, there would, be no argument. ettion. 1 have talked with people in authority of thrêe of thé different na- There w-ouldbe-only one great impulse. tiýLs at W.eý to'begin work not tomorrow mQrýùîng, 1 kzow that Gumany io well gapplied 'but to-léght. ýýefth - tood, thàt oh.e han so ehangealier Let me again quote from a jette-r lest crops during the lw,;t thirteen yeazz --hauded me, writteg hy a la4y Who là that women can till-ýhàr fieldge that she travelling . from hoffpital te hospital in .ein Yièld practicallY enough wheat and x*rthom Yranee- hopm'u In @me..,way Prap% 117 enongh ment te supply-her to relleve thë gr -ai pep y tbont depeudc ý\"Our workers havé Leentral 'dipet,\"",
         "THE CANADIAN WAR, 7 of goods in their different 'depart- we have six here.' ments' and visit the different hoepitals, «'This is to show that help cannet question the nurses and doctors, and come fro.m the Prench; they, have %ée the patients; then we distribute really doue their utmost and 1 have ciily. thosë neeessities that are urgently been touehed by, the simple way in needed and those that would not be which all classes have comMned in provided by another society or by the gr6at, self-sacrifice and devotion,- the Government. most delicate women have ýmanaged te \"For instance, a fortnight ago at leave their couehes and te give at least Iloulgate where 1 was working, 1 knew somp hours of work-every day in the by personal investigation that there hospitals; and many T know have work- were ouly seventy fiannel jackets, ed froni morning to inight without mis- thirty-six flannel shirts, and no more sing'a day from the beginning of the soeks for the men in seven hundred war. and fdty 'beds, there were also only Some.English Testimony. eight bottles of ether left (and more \"Now for direct personal help te- the eannot be got in France), very little doetors. I ganze for dressings, very little absorb- , interviewed the surgeons; ent cotton, very lïttle proxide of they raid their great want was for hydrcgen, ne, more alcohol to be clo- surgical instruments, whieh they had tained and not much iodine. not been able to find anywhere in the ý'For four hundred and fifty beds in towns around. They absolutely one of the Houlgate hospitals there was pouneed with delight on those 1 net\u003e one trained nurse; the ncrsing bc- brought from, Enýgland.\" ing doue by amateur ladies, niùst de- An English nurse, after visiting one -,,oted and some quite skilful, but none of the impoverished.hospitals in north- able te treat really severe cases of very ern France, writes: \"We were shown bad wounds, typhoid, diptheria, gang- the typhoid ward, The room. had about rene, tetanus, et cetera. nine typhoid cases in it and a more dis- gusting sight you cannût imagine. The Comtesse In Borrow and Work. air was affisolutely fetid, the floor CeBoys of sixteen, girls with hair fllthy, slopped over, with wafer or down their Ïbacks, young maids, et worse. Sheets fllthy, one dirty table cetera, were among the workers. covered with dirty newspapers on \"In. most d the provincial hospitals whieh dishes, cups, drinks and Intions the dmtors and workers a,ýe se tre- stand higgledypiggledy. niendously Ibuey and have se often \"Bedpan arrangements make one vainly tried te get help, nurses and quail. The one old nun in attendance §upplies, that they have give it UP net dabbles aroundemptying thingo in the knowingw'here or how their wants are pail; she bas afbsolutely no help, She .te be met', bas no time te diainfect or even wasli Phe Preneli are really depriving ber handst We asked where bedpans themselves of every- sort of luxury se were kept. - She said they could net as te help ffieir wounded te the utmost. be used as there was no one te help., T have in -front of me the letter of a The patients got up (some have Pren-ch comtesse whose husfiand has temperatures of 104 degrees, but no bem killed 'at the wàr (she has three one seems te think, that mattersl) sonS, fightirog and two amall ones at Atout all thai eau 'be donc is te ýiVe home),, she had'beforé the war, motor, seine food M the patients.\" horffes and many servântsi She writes 1 Dottor Raden.Cuest writes: \"Ùsual- ,as if it was quite natural. Il ri\" at ly th«ýEnglish -çýounded are- in àinbul- 6 il5 iü the jnbtnlng tô light the flxe -be- ance trains with dmtors and orderlies pause it is necessary that I ald 'in'- the -but the Chers are of-ten net- en fortan- housework; this is excellent. for me and ate. Sometimes they are given.inee ikéepè ràe,. froni thiniking too uiueh of cal attention and sometiln8g:llôt. And our sorroivis'.' I wôA in thie hospità1s; so theY afriYe Rt liffle railway 'Stations",
         "THE CANADIAN WAR, where they are disenilbarked,, dropped enougb doctorâ, there are not eilough on the platforms. nurses. Never, itseems, can there havé \"In one night perhaps two thousand been in our planet's history a gréatei wounded passed through this station; human need than now existe. Many, on one train there were seven hundred. wounds are jagged and terrible-men Almost Invariably the wounds are eut, torn and carved into every foully septie, acute gangerene (neces- fantastie posàbility of deformity. And sitating amputation) is common, there are hundreds of thousands of tetanus is common. There are not them. WHOSE CAUSE IS THIS? Au Appeal for Enfightenment as toi What le Going to be Done About Canadian Hospital Service at, the Front. UST as this nuiaber: goes toi press the following letter is reeeived. A PRAYER FOR POLMOS. Tt will fbe dealt with next week. Cannot The Canadian War take up 0 Lord, give us courage always the matter of the representation of to face the'enemy, which is our- Canadian womanhood in the serious qelves. Let clear light break upon, work of the warf All belligerent the work whick is very near. Teach aountries are doing their utmost to us that our country must be our ineet the need for hospital services at abiding concern; and that Thy the front' and ' elsewhere, so as to pleasure is that in its affairs, we ininimise suffering and save life. Can- strive to make Thy kingdom come. ada is a Ïbelligerent country. There Shew us that we cannotneglect our shouldbe more and more Canadian wo- civic duty in time of peace u4thout men in this service. There is a grow- falling short of the heights of ing fear that the need for them is not patriotism in the dread test of war. yet realised by those in authority. Help us to acquire the discern- Tt is being widely said that although ing mind, and the unfaltering wiU niore than t\" hundred qualified to do the things, we oùght to do; nurses volunteered for service abroad for the good name of Our country; thpir offer was turned down in such for the respect of our children; and a way as to make them ehary of of. the gratitude for our deeds which fering to serve their country in future. they.may cherish wheti we are no' It is also being said that political in- more. Rid us learn, through the fluence was apparent in some of the suffering of this war, our supreme few aecepténcès from. Ottawa. task in politics; and to do it, with- That may bc a relatively small mat- out heed to fortune. ter; for it is inconceivwble that we can While Our sons and brethren go mueh longer without a great in-, bear our fate into the appall4ng erease in the number of Canadian wo,- field, ma-y we justify their sacrifice men who are in the war zone. There is for us by devotion to our commom no time to lose. Will not The Canadiaà citizenship, which is true godli- War, which strikeis ý@uch a gtrong, nus; and the only domfortabte healthy, and fair patrietie note, let the 17 rance of the life to com. ijublie know ex-mtly what the situation Amen. An en*oy« Who Suld do nothinz Mm- was loaned twenty-ave cents ý0r a lmwh sud belt sent a dovm-and-out gentlemanli, man'to given a chança to sen the paper. In the a£- true aMeeot 'Mbe Canatan War,\" hoping he ternom he eamed a dditar arid a hait ofe miht fInd soinetliinig to In. On sise-up be what rmr subsermlor Is dolng?",
         "te haesettruhteae vnw Whmtegd oledfrapol re And ade remndou fo therac notruA Sec we have slp~t amgeccerud And n te deam e hve magied uch",
         "GREAT APPEAL MUST BE IMPERIAL Native-born Canadians Will, Act Instantly if They Are Given Definito Leadership, for National Liberty* in Danger and We Xust Fight to the Limit. BY PETER MCARTHUR N the pages of The Canadian War prdblems to regard themselves .4 and in the pulblie-press it bas been citizens of a free nation within the Ein- stated with regret that native-éorn pire, and they are loyal to the King as Qanadians are not enlisting as they the Over-lord of the Empire. should. Such statisties as are avail- It was this feeling of Imperial loyalty able show that the criticisin is well that became evident when hostilities founded-although recent reports indi- began. Canadians of all parties sup- cate au improvement-and as a natiTe- ported the Government in supporting born Canadian wýho believes that Can- the war. Everyone awaited auxionsly ada's future is involved in the issue of the tall to duty. Then the newspapeis the war I propose to review the causes began to print, merely as a matter of of this apathy, and if possible to sug- news in most cases, the' campaign of gest the remedy. insult thatwas being carried on in the In My opinion, which, is purely old land to shame men to the colors. personal, and whieh other native-born Some writers were so ill-advised as C4nadians may repudiate, the dif- tri adapt this style of campaign to Can- fleulty îs due to twe main eauses,4- ada and to. hurl insults at Canadians laek of understandingof the charaeter for not enlisting at once. In the rural of Canadian citizenship by those who districts the effect was instantaneous. are urging enlistment, and a failure on To the self-respecting Canadian this the part of Canadians to realize the style of campaign was personalljy in, imminence of the danger. sulting. I heard many denounce it with unmeasured wratý. Others dre* The Way of Prostitution. baek in offended silence. The ordinary appeals and catch yvords of loyalty and patriotism will What Great Appeal Must Be. tiot serve in this crisis. They have been This was no way to - arouse tiie âo much cheapened in the trivialities of loyalty of free citizens of the Empîrý. past politieal campaigns that now in Added to this came the _announcement Î1ýsý hour of need they have lost their from - authoritaitive sources that Can. force. As one native-éborn Canalab adians must produee, food supplies for àeid to me recently, \"We have prosti- the war. This campaign hasbeen urpa tuted our loyalty; and now that we with more insistenoe than the campaign need her we doubt her virtue.\" for enlistment. Before the country eau be properly As the majority of Canadians in the atouried. we must face existing facts rural districts are producers it earrW iýid be guided bytheir logie. Even the weight, None- of them could enlist anthorized Briti* history taught in without limiting production to nome ,our schools teRs us that for seventy extent. This campaign has bgep years \"The Canadians were left to strengthenéd by the appeal of the Min. .,ïolve their problems for themselves.11 ister of Finance for more products où, nt It, states further that this isolation han to, save thé national eredit. Ï4t weakened thoir loyalty; but the These diverse appeals caused àbfmian ný1ght have ishown that it has certainty and hesitation, which ne wbrked..a ehange. dou-btedly affeeted enliatment, But.. _ýLn11ùadof thinking of themselves as we are given -definîte leadership -w o Canaýdiam have leamea will clearly place More Canadýàùs est ekair owp ýheir duty as, Oitweps of -the.., Empire, 1",
         "THE CANADIAN WAR. il am confident that they %vill act instaDt- train that had carried him àc-rosis part ly. No one bu yet pointed out the of the West. unquestioned path of duty-perhaps With arme folded on his ample chest, because no one knows it. But when the and with shoulders and head thrown ereat appeal is made it must be made back the engineer was talking with his to free men, and not addressed to de- future king. Conseious of his. manhood pendents or beneficiaries of past lie stood unembarrassed and unrebuked bounty. It must be an Tmperial call to ir. the presence of royalty. Under the Tmperial eitizens. Picture the editor had written, \"Note Consider the character of our native- the attitude of the engineerl\" born Canadian citizenship. There is To the editor and to the men who nothing quite like it in all the world. weré laughing over the picture it seem- We have enjoye-d freedom past the gift ed incredible that any working man of kýkgs» Of the Canadian it might be should dare to maintain such an. at- aaked as of Job. \"Hast not Thou made titude in the presence of royalty. , But an hedge about him, and about his if they had noted with understanding houèe, and about all that he hath on they would have a better conception of eyery side? Thou hast blessed the the character of Canadian citizenship. w . ork of his hands, and his snheance is Who Would Endure Militarism? increased in the land. How would that Canadian working- Ne Owns No Supehor. man, who stood erect before his future Owing to a peeuliar political develop- king, endure the humiliâting 1 insolence ment the native-born Canadian is the of a Prussian drill sergeant7 Would most independent man on earth. Until he endure -being pushed from the side- the present time no question of publie walk by anyone wearinga military uni. polley bas interfered with him suf- form, and would bc taniely submit to ficiently to hamper his personal liberty, having the military authorities supreme or to affect injuriously any of his over the civil authority! He would die activities. Possibly bc does not reeog- first. nize clearly enough that only under the The source of this Canadian inde- Briti:èh flag would his unique indeperid- pendence and freedom i's seldom dis- ence be possible. eussed frankly. To one large class it Free born in a free country he owns is the direct gift of the British Govern- no man as his superior. The humblest ment; and eonstiltates a debt that can citizen may rise to the highest position never be repaid. To another class it in the land. Naturally, this incredible is the result of the fortitude of the freedom bas reacted on the national liberty4loving men and wonien Who eharacter. Pouquered the wilderness and jealously \"Yon are ruied by a King,\" said an guarded their rights. ' American to a Canadian, The parents of a large mass of Can- \"AÉewel\" was the answer. \"We adian-jbornéitizens came to the country -have forgotten that we are ruled nt with nothing in theil- hand\u0026 Many of air. \u003e P, ý ý, 1 them came to escape oppression. By The Canadia-n who made that rep«ly 'heroic toil they hewed out homes for wae not a eoiner of epigrains and liad themselves in the beeland, where their no -desire to be clever. He 'merely ehildren -could enjoy the fèeédom that \"Stated a fadt, was denied to Ithem. In London, England mome years ago 1% is iàot altogéther surprising that saw a group of En ishmen at a - club their children attribute their freedom writhing- in silent and shame-faud to the courage and se-11-sacrifice of such mir\u0026 over a piature in 1«The Sphère,\" parents. It îs no part of My purpoee -whiQh illustratea an article on our to provoke a controversy on this point. prèient, -Ringýd tour through Canada. 1 call'attention iôît -merely so that the ýIL showed the\"then I)ùke 'of Yoi-k in \u0026Ppeàl for Canadian support of the con-eergation with the engineer of the war may -be made btoad enoùgh to",
         "THE CANADIAN WAR. arouse all elasses withont -exciting and preserve its prieeless liberties. AI] antagonism. other issues eease to, exiBt in the face of Whatever the source of our liberty it this paramount issue. is now threatened with extinction, un- Canadians as a rule are opposed to less we bestir ourselves. AH Can- war. * 'they regard it aa a cruel, in- adians reeognize, though perhaps some- excusable crime against eivilization. what vaguely, their place in the Em- But a war has Qome which diplomaey pire. This Imperial apirit le the one was unable to avert. A nation bent on that muet be aroused. world-conquest threatens the libertieg No matter what shall be the flnal of all the world. We may bate war, form of the triumphant Empire- but we muet fight if we are to live as whether it shall have a central author- free men. For Canada there le no ity issuing commande, or be made up of escape from the fullest participation in free nations working in harmony-it the confliet. Muet now be United to its farthest If the Empire should be destroyed borders to face the common danger. Canada would be the logical prize ol Its final form will be a matter for vietoribus Germany. We have no'right statesmen to work ont in times of to expect the United States to protect peace. us unless we do all in our power to pro- At present it le enough to realize tect ourselves, Our only safety lies in that the Empire muet stand or fall as a firmly est\u0026blishing the, Empire ý which unit, and that no part of it can be alone makes possible a continuance of permanently subjugated without the the liberties we enjoy. Ifwe do our subjugation of all. Only by rising to part we shall have a voice in establish- our full stature ae eitizens of the Em- ing a peace whieh -will make an end of pire can ýwe be truc to our native land, war. -NATION AL H70NOR The difference between the spurions and the sublime, which, demands that President Wîlaon shall re-adjust his course, to answer to the self-respect of the Republic. BY BÉNJAMIN A.'GOULI) There le such a thing as the honor of these claims le not recognized. There of a nation. It le the only thing that le never has been a jingoigni or a mili- worth fighting for. It le the only thing tarism that has not deelared itaelf te be that ean xûake future wars unnecessaTy. the guardian of national honor. There in no phrase whieh has been so It le a stock difiguise. It haî bewme misused, none whieh has no frequently se common that those who have had the been made a cover for greed and ag- wit to penetrate it, but not the under- gression. It hasbeen the eloak bohind standing to reason inoisively, have whieh, Junkerism has hidden its ugli- come to think that national honor is a n'Mo - £'Wolf 1 wolf 1 'l' has been shout- mere mask, a tisane to, cover national ed no many times th#t -diwb-elief: has aggression, the tiine-worn excuse of beùôine habitual. But the faet remains the n ' ational blùly. none the leos flat *olves do exist and -international treatieî of arbitration that the honor of a nation le lis mont 'have habitually exeepted subjecte of holy heritagè. dispute whieh involve national honor; Every evil cause seeks to bolster and many think that this -exception itself up With ola='Ls of good, and often has nullified their, value beeaine it in sufflé In ' riaging what in really often claimed that national honor in good into dierepute because the falillity involved, when in fact only national",
         "THE CANADIAN WAR. la interest or national désire is at stake. Conditions may arise, however, An excellent illustration of this false where national honor is involved, claim of national honor being involved where a nation must act to preserve its iE given by the recent Vera Cruz inci. honor. This honor is not affected by dent. Heré a government, which was the aet of the other nationbut an ont- diplomatically unrecognized, and there- side act may be such that the nation fore diplomatically non-existent, re- damages its honor by not itself acting, fused to explode a salute of a certain A nation's honor is in its own charge number of guns in token of respect to aiftd ean bc affected only by its own the nation which refused to acknowl- acts or failures to act. edge the existence of the erring gov- The most common instance affecting ernment *hieh refused to fire the guw. the honor of a nation is the existence of National honor was therefore involv- a condition which requires action for ed and Vera Cruz had toi bc seized. But the fulfilment of its obligations, A when the government which did not nation cannot with honor £ail in its exif3t diplomatically ceased to exist engagements any more than can a busi- aetually, Vera Cruz was not evacuated. ness bouse. The most solemn under- Later, wýhen nothing had -been accom- takings of a nation are those which lished, and the guns still remained un- it voluntarily assumesby ïts treaties. So fired, the troops were withdrawn from long as, the obligations of its treaties Vera Cruz. remain in force any' nation loses its Honour Comes from Within. honor if it neglects them. If this thing were not serions, it Solenin and Voluntary, would bc opera 'bouffe. Everybody Belgium. was in honor bound to resist k4ows that the question of national the German invasion of ber frontier honor had nothing whatsoever to do with the affair. The United States can Rather than lose ber honor she was eontinne, tô exist without inconvenience willing to suff er the uttermost that can even if General Ruerta does not fire come to any nation. Her action and twenty-one guns. It cannot continue ber sacrifice will forever place her to exist if it ceases to be truc to itself. name foremost on the roll of them to It may well be that the United States whom honor was supreme. not ouly ought to have taken Vera Great Britain was in honor bound to Cruz, but onght to have done a great déclare war against Germany when deal more, -but it is ridieulous to Cloud Belgiums neutrality was violated, and the duty with nonsense about its she has taught the world the value of ,bonor being insulted by a lack of guns. scraps of paper wheD they contain a National'honc has to do with the nation's honor. eonduet of a nation, not with the Cou- When the question of the obligation du-et of other nations toward it. The of the United States arose in connec- ,other ide\u0026 la that which was at the root tion wiýth tolls on the Panama canal, ,of the obsolete duello. If a cad thumbs Mr. W. ilson very properly reaEzed that ýbig, iiose at a gentleman, the latter is the honor of his country demanded that mo longer held to be wounded in his it should do. nothing that by any nicety bonor pmdobliged to risk his life of construction eoùld'be held, to bc con- -Thé same thing is equally true of trarY- tO its treaty understandings' Ap- Thé earrying of chips on parently, however, he bas never heard Il ational shoulders is ont of date, and Of the conventions Of the Hague hongr is not injured by the ill-ibreeding Tribunal, signed by President Roose- of others. Whén thus stated in plain volt, or assuredly he must, as to thora, words, this proposition seema gelf- al-8o have safeguarded the bonor of his evident; but a fafinre to recognize it country. h ai been the basis of many wars which there is also a national honor deeper ot*her*ise *Ould. never hRve 4en per- and more fundamental than that whieh mitted to bacur. contes from written under-standîngs.",
         "14 'rliE CANADIAN WAR. This is the duty of every nation to be world the United States îBhall inake. its true to, its history, to its ideals, to the position clear and unmistakablej Mr. conception of freedom. on whieh it has Wilson will not be forgiven for not been erected. Noblesse oblige for a acting in accordance with the - tradi- nation, as for a man, and the honor of tions and the nobility of hie country. a United States demands a far higher No fear of the Matant Germans in standard o-f unselfishness than the the land, \"vocal out of all proportion honor of San Domingo requires. to their numbers or their importance,\"' It is the daty of every President*to wiR serve to excuse him. Ilowever guard this unwritten and inherent 'interesting the game of party ýolitics honor as sedulously as it is to sec that may be, he bas no right at this time, his country's treaties are performed. and in this matter, to play it. The rank of anation among its fellows I believe the honor of the. United may be judged Iby the fineness of this States is too great and too sacred a tin.written honor, fer mueh must be thing to bc destroy.edby any one man. given by them who - possess much. - It Il it shall happen that the man to whom iF3 the soul of a nation, and the great- the.-honor of the country is chielly en- nes8 of this soul is shown by its willing- trusted shall prove unworthy of Ws ness to perform. in the - conerete what it stewardship, the action whieli the honor professes in the abstraet. of the nation demands may be delayed. The American people has a right to , but eannot be prevented. look to the President to express the The judgment of the people when soul of the nation, This nation has time has been given for the crysWliza- been founded on democracy, has bled tion of its thought will pirove irresist- for demoeracy, and through democracy ible. Such a condition makes it doubly ha8 come to its present high estate. It the duty of the clear-thinking, and has until now typified demneracy to patriotic. to spread the propaganda of -the world. national idealism, and to make it _eviý - - Now that the deepest and moist sac- dent to the people that the very great- redhonor of thenation demands that in ness of the land and its history forbids the colossal struggle between demo- it to stand aside when al! that it holéis ergey and absolution throughout the holy is at stake in the world. THE LETTERS OF CIVILIS' TO tâe Pt. 9011. sir Ro'bert Borden, Prime Minister of Ow\" . It-is not eaay to détermine whèther be approazhed by partieularly selèMel ýrimaMy to addreu your office or beings who theln'gelves looli down up*n yduiýsolf, because of a certain un- the inere aveiage a mankind,' At ihe eettàinty as te whether you regard saine time thère is reluctanze in qùiët yourself as belonging to the office, or people to adétrées you, on your dis- whether, the office is an incidental to charge 01 the dutiës w1i1eý -belong to thp èxpression -of yourself. At. all YW ility. o -high estate aýadvasi rësponsi-bq ýevmts yon are Prime Minister.\u003eOf Can- Fe\"aref -fraùk spéeehbiai beébm'e an AU ' Those whom you - serve Are auxibus t6 serve you. They delight to obaooeo,, even ïzi the most eoùrageons 'know that their Man is bigger than his peûples. Indeeýà, feii is one ýôf fle job- mut powerfül ammunitions in the Sobody has e-ver aecused yon of POlitieftl armoury. liq something thinki-ng more highly of younw1f than whieh politieians of the baser sort t=î you ought to think. Yo-Q do not a-well upon those th'at ap.pr«ehý tbem. It lig in $me for-oit regîom whieh can only one of the attributes of other politieians",
         "THE CANADIAN WAR. 15 who, while they se-em to be bold, will modesty of deprecation. The Scots- do anything rather than tell those froin man's prayer that God would give the whom they derive their legal power present suppliants a good conceit of -the things which -crught to be known. themselves is divinely Kpplica)ble to Fear begets an astonishing lack of Prime Ministers. Vandour in public life.' When you were making your Cabinet You are well acquainted -with the three years ago, good friends of yours elusive and delusive orthodoxy of the - mere partisan. At convenient seasons who had wrought the best they knew to it stands upon the limitations which the lielp you win the election, were impel- law seems to set up. At other times it led to beg you to realize that you were is wondrougly resoureeful in finding the boss of 'the job-that nobody could ways by which coaches and sixes ean say you nay. lt is said that the last man who sees you has your mind, and be driven through acts of Parliament. that when tjiings are not going happily Too Much Lawyer, Perhaps. for you there is a tendency to resign. The Prime Minister can do just about Sometimes a Premier hints to other men what lie wants to do. Thut doctrine is that it miay belcome their , duty to seek not agreeable to you, because yours is freedom. preeminently a lawyer's mind; but it You must be well aware of these bc- fits the premiership of a British liefs that permea:te the publie mind. If country. Of course, it presumes that you du not overhear the discussions of the man in your place is temperament- some of your Parliame-ntary supporters ally obedient to laws whieh lie inay ii, is not because they are not vocal. presently change. It also presumes Sometimes it is better to hear the that he is a man of resource, and cour- candid than the sugar-candied. age. When the war oame you did The candid friend is mighty ineon- things for whieh there was no pro- venient; but if you can be sure of his vision in the statutes. Parliainent and charaeter he is worth fifty of the other the nation endorsed you. In timeB like kind. It is the peculiar danger of a these the only unforgivable thing is Prime Minister that nearly all of those too little mtion; too tardy an assump- who speak with him. say the thing they tion of responsibilit*y. The, nation needs suppose he likes to hear--especially a general more than it needs a repre- about hïmself. Having your car to the sentative. It knows thst generals are ground is not a particularly digni:6ý not oonspienous for their legà] winds, ed position; but it is ýbetter than having There is a growing idea in the to depend on somebody else's ear rountry -whieh acknowledges you as its lirst citizen that your conception of the It has been nbticed that in- really plau of the leader of a Government is , busy times you have announeed that that of a law.yer doing the best he you are too occupied to read t1je neww- papers. If you will allow a friend tc\u003e knows for his clients rather than that of a general eommanding. - Il that is say so, that isa, really dangerous symp.- t in the Prime Minister of a British really your conception it will account OM for many M the diffleulties which. have, democracy. It is wbout the surest way bmet your Premienhip, he could take, to lose acquaintance witk the people from yvhoe he directly de- Another ideawhich liasgone abro.ad rives his power. is thai your estimate of yQur eapacity Not to read the newspapers is like is excçedinglymocleigt . It Io ýxnpowible notsoeing your supporters when Parlia- to hCmor modesty at the -expenRe of ment is sitting. The new'spaper editor stren$tb. If a man think not highly of who daily gives attention to the things the powýevâ whieh he, more thau any, 'hieh combine to m a-ke publie opinion th e within him, r, shoula know are how un he. expeet ethers to receive a 1R the most valuable man with whom ýigh'jànpre'Mîoný0f Ms quahtyl T]len any Prime MiniRter can contact. Tke id A-;Uqd\u0026#y of eoiýficlence as weil PR a (Continned on page 19.)",
         "TAKE A DOLLAR TO YOUR DOCTOR Idke the rest of us, you have often said, \"The pople dealing with'the part which eiglht miin British sub- to go,' and can't get wy of Caa haen begun to realie what thswr jcsae0adgi olcstly war-ocostly soon In Onie of the things The Canadian War wants to help You have said that. What has the remark meant to Do yon know that of the biggest publishing mp Cais to andce the Government to stvha y? Hve YOU begun to realize what your own duty houses in Toronto-Impe»s To'ronto-refused even their country where there is appligsfei o to it le? ~~to read any manus ris from well-known writers behalf of their cutyscue Ash; two or three questions-for instance, What have which it could have hdfree of cost, because they said Canada is nt amr evn fohrprso h you done? You have PAID-sure you have. But pay- the CanaMian people-people exactly Hike yucr o Epeino ahi re servante ofher a elrt f h ing in money isn't paying with life. The GovernLment little about their own war that they ul o Empirte n thisgret srugle the sr a eigperen- can take more money from you than you will ever give enuhto pyfor the pitn? k afgonl b aellig refo the Wsterny o eisheroe inr freely to the war.Ta is aisct an tÎoeofheacsw re -d fit whse stakne ae th ity oe holei world Have you THÔUGHT? How much time have you behind you fa, nd omne ofat te Cia hieople it ispl u inown men incluwed-shalle long ssll given to your duyand privilege as a citizen towçards have not begun to reaHaze that they are really at wa, in Frnepl e--u , adend-suffe andy ths wa hc s decide the very existence of frie an are xod to the pysical perils of war as 11l Can aa me who want to sucr the are denid the Have you SAID? Don't be fooled into supsg heat your skin tilt makes you lobi, at s ote saiy.w Much is begudn, to rasz yow u ho that sound speech about the war Is wasted. Tepeo- made.other pole's blood boil. ýpthere is tdo.ae' eu o eHehwmc ple who decry speaking usually say nothing Worth It was letto a body of newspýe writers to pr- .Doeo think that when oroncsat it ei hearing. How can you act or get anybody else to \u0026et duce a publication to poehterthe big publishr te om in weshall be couren ow caalv y listhe begi un e s o t l ? n alabout h s b at tist a e oe a b u th q u ltfo ew f r o n wm e and o t r t m nse Canada and the War. What have you read about the Canadn* mnd was lbeling his countrymen and what we are paint Canadta's part in the war, and ABOUT YOUR PART women. The naup hne o epeigtedm o IN CANADA'S PART in the War? Your akaadren Thatblcto is TeOanadian War. 18 i a da e- an en getnina f deepvieg heedemand for and ybur ohildren's children will want to know all thia, cent wemy.Those who rt n edit it- do no ge a nee xt enion pofessrie wher Canta ismos Do yea kiiow that, though your country is epcig cent for altheir labor. eAtits will Illustrate it in doctr is medysina oession in anada.i pulevery to send two hundred thousand men to fi nEur. future for the same always, innt Wae e ssias patrerSîe ei te pube manr- opeO WROM TEOUSANDS WILL 00EUCME It is intended to doeo rcia Cakarin Whaot heCm ntve ph ay a ercives h e th one an i andpaphet deotd o he ar wic paphet o it mris sr pulcUui arfee. bitg i a t i heerpga o Canda War, n Cros Apeal foer",
         "THE CANADlAN WAR. Cross, Patriotic, Belgian- and others. You spend money on a patriotic concert-it is gSd; very good. You might not go if It were not for a -patriotic object. But inà eh as you do go you get ygur money's worth of entertainm ut. Those, who sing have the satisfaction of helping a grest caus\u0026 Vou are doubly blessed. It is about the same with subscriptions to, The Canà- dian War. You get more thau your money's worth in the magaçne. Notliiài dealm'g exoltLoi,ýely With thé 'war, that is publisbed at the same'pecé, gives anyý- thing fike the same amount'of matter-to say nothing of the quality of the wor of some of the best-known journalists in Canada, Paml hnlets which have been imported from Brftain and 2 as Much, d extpnsively 40 net colntain -half mâterial as that of The Canadïan War, and not a Une of it is Canadian. The Canadiail.War is the only war publication made in Canada. In your subscription you give abc to the War Funds, and you create amployment for people who would otherwise be without it. The Canadian War is already furnishing constant 'employment, through printing and selling, lor twenty-five people. « You are not helping a commercial enterprise, but you are helping your own Canadian citizenship. Nothing else offers go much opportunity for national service over go wîde a range at go small a'cost as this Eame paper, and the effitors knôw that they are on sure ground, when they invite your cordial oo-operation in this work. Subuiiptiýn Form for \"The C UAâ. War\" Please send THF- CANADIAN WAR to the undermentioned addresses for .. ........... weeks for which I. enclose $ ............ In the second colurans are th 1 e names of friends who, 1 tbink would be likely to subscribe. READERS PAID FOR POMffl SUBSCRIMS ..... ........... .. ........ .... ...... ......... ......... ................. . ....... . ...... ..... . ....... .... . . . . .. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .............. . ........ . .... ......... .............. .... ....... .. ..... ... .... ......... .... ............",
         "THE CANADIAN WAR. 19 (Continued from pAge 15.) was, \"I cannot say anything about eontact takes such a little while, too. that. Whene-ver one thinks of a Prime Min- Your admirers--those who had writ- ister keeping in touch with the publie ten to you-hoped that you would have whose confidence lie hopesi tà -retaini - one put the talk of an élection to an pictures a man who makes it his busi- ignominious end. ness to read a newspaper at a glanee, There wasýno élection, but the pôpu- who extracts the pith froin an éditorial lar estimation of the episode is not that 80 mily and speedily as he dra ws the Prime Minister killed the posai- brÉath, , bilitY 01 an unworthy appeal as soon as Things like these are not trivial. itwas broaehed; but that the promoters They are of the essence of control of a Of it did not quite suceeéd. publie situation. In sum they make . There has been a death to partylgin mach of the dïfference between leader- in Britain. There should be a death to ship whieh inspires and leadership partyisin in 6011hection *ith the2'wà'Ë'.in whieh forRo^wspublie opinion. Old Sir Canada. The one sure dékroyerof that Robert Morier, who died ambassador evil ean be thé Prime Miniàter. The at Berlin, and who was one of the publie begins to think that thelkilling wisest servants of the Crown, usied to cannot be dohe'bv a policy of Il 1 'have gay that it is the busïness of a states- nothing to gay.- man to bc five per cent. ahead of publie For Your Refreshment. .,opinion. It is not demagognery to The admi know what publie opinion is. it is Inistrative burdeÉ you have statesmanship to know, partly by faith to carry is heavy indeed. But adminis- and partly by information, where it is !ration is chiefly a question of delegat- going to be and tobe there before it, Ing détails to subordinates who are ne Plpt That Palled. honest, ýeàpable and endowed. with Public spirit. There never need be You -are shortly to meet Parliament lack Of Such in times like this. Neither for the fifth time as Prime Mim'ster. is there lack O'f willingness for publie ,This isno place in which to'presume to service in ever.-ý eommullity. That Gov- tender advice to the King's adviser. priimélit is a great government which But, as the humblest of us, Wheh lie )zfi6ýeà hë* to evake the makimum, -of votes, passes J-adgment on 'yoùr -acts, publie service from those to whom- it it is proper to Bay hoW your disclosed does not ordinarily loèk ýor friendàhip. ;dtitnde ta publie opinion on a question There seems to ýbe a fea:r in Ottawa Ihat is past, otrika one of your ùlti- that Canadians mate judg«. Of every degree cannot bc rélied upon fo render servi'eè regard- étronàr attempt wu made to force a less of whiat - are calle'd party'poit.ties. -géiibi-àl\u003e eleetion last fall. The lest of The -atmoepherë of Ottawa inay, eo'n- éupporters said privately thât âUel, du ce to, a mean estimatý of thé a Ptmee\u0026hg -Woule be an -outtaee on for unselfish service in' . the ünc-41 Csâadian pWtrictisin', ah 'Inelt-â'Mènt to pný blie. That in \u003eone of the.reagQfle why dieunion, -and a- yïtîfu-l sPectaek 'to, it is really inWiff-bént\" upôn the 15fijne eresent; to the alien withih our' g4'tes Minister ta read the n e*spùpén. - - The and tô -,bur he\u0026vier thé tjjýýéj,.ùe m6re paténtthat bordera. The temper of pablié opinion \"neeggoitry. The süegeeo:n is:ôffe d-'ýýôr ras. a again thé-seheme whigh\"waf3 iýônrtefreeàlùèht Ëiiia -forý.yènr ý -..eôh. ýh ' ed yo -Cabinet. The Mont- leaI St denô ed it as a gr\"e im- morality. The. %vernor-General was believed to be as much against plùng- TO BIR WILMM LAIMIER \u003e ing the, 00= Mto partisan iitrife 'go 7%6'9edond oý The Létters oý,ciVjjj, the -MOntreal ' 'r Wu. Yon WM g: Will be addressed fo the Rt, Ron. .8ir to.for guiIdaným. All yeu wald Wilfrirl Laürier,",
         "WOMEN AT THE, FRONT The hoopitab that are organizoo, otaffed and ftanced by women includë one whioh brings the woiüided from the ffiing line. By CONSTANcE RunY'BRD ]BOULTON T seems en awfàl thing to say that, them, the same impelling power that it ont of this - horror whieh lies is to men; the supreme and imperative heavily upon the soul of a shud- call to self-saerifice for the upholding dering world, has arisen a glorious of ideals. With the bitter tears bc- opportunity, whieh has been seized by hind their smiling eyes women are bid- that half of the world whieh does not ding their husbands, sono, brothers and count, in a way that has justified be- s7eethearts \"Go'ý--a sublime submis- yond all controversy a great claim that sion to the only way, bis been made with a calm. and unalter- Into -that tragie bidding is gathered able faith in ultimate victory. the heroism, whieh faces the terrible It has been proved that courage, reaUty of the trenehes and the agony patriotism, resource, generosity, saeri- of waiting at home. In this infinite fice belong not alone to those who bear sacrifice, made unhesitatingly, uncom- arms unflinehingly into the, jaws of 'plainingly, unconditionally by women death. for the sake of their ideals, for that il- It is estimated that nearly three mil- lusive, heroie thing, love of country lion men have been killed, wounded, or and all that it means; in the wonderfal missing in, the last five months on the constructive service being rendered by battlefields of Europe. For every one British women, -in the midst of utter of those three million men there is or annihilation, is a glorious refutation of has bee-n a iÉother. Yet we are told the charge that women do notcount in when it comes to war and fighting wo- world problems. m en do not count. Only Two Men Bere, The noblest human virtue. The prominent, effeetive part ýv\u0026me4i .We are told the mother instinct is are taking in the present Imperial the noblest human virtue, the eompel- crisis is Mng eniphasized throueh. ling power which glorifies human maDy important national organizations. nature and Utàm it up with the deep The hDspital service estaiblished byýthe t'hings of the spirit. N. U. W. S. S. of Great Britain, lu the The mother instinct of th, world has war zone, is a striking exampleof tboir been outraged, and from the piteous, eapaeiýy and resonreefulneus.» proatiaté,, ileeding heart of woman has 01 the Stabart Hospital at Antwerp, been wrung acry of revolt whieh will equipped, maintained, and served en- never en doctors, nurse and *àgain be huehed till to the suf.- tirelY IY w0m .\u0026 fe '161 sacrillee has been added the orderlies, the Amerfeau iConsul-General ring joyor an intelligent free-will offering of Beliium has said of - service to, the nation. One of the first - buildings , to be AIl-ý the . mental, emotional, and elielled was thtat Mn wýth such mag-_ -»ysiiud iLiiesh'whiëhis the inevitable niffcent efficiencY by -the 'British. we- ý'P'ortim ý of women was once accounted men daetors. \" 1 - . 1 '_ , ; as nothing, beeaun women do not gýiVe The- staff of the St(ybart\"ý H,6spitgi their bodies as food for the devi S Consists of four dbett)U, twervé tiainea bunger of war. In these days au èver- nurses, and teû brderlies. Thé bnly whelming rmrd la -being made, avast men employed are the treasiirer''and a amount of passionate constructive ser- mochanie. The isystematie arrange- vice, in the mMet et destruction, is ment, and absence of noise and con- being accompEshed. fusion are- frequently remarkea by Women are showing that duty im to visitoims. The X-,ray'\u0026Pparatus of this,",
         "THE CANADIAN WAR. 21 hospital is üsptcial1ý, accurate and the -ý%,omen, with the exception of two most modern whieh can be procured. orderlies. The work of Dr. Louisa Garrett When it is realized thbt a very large Anderson, the Vice-President, is of percentage of the Army Medical Corps great interest. She is the daughter of officers have been killed and that these Mrs. Garrett Anderson, M. D., who women go right up to the firing Une te forty years ago fought for and won the get the wounded it eau no longer be admission of women into the medical denied that w'onien are serving under profession in England. Dr. Louisa fire aide by side with their comrades in Garrett Anderson bas established a brins. splendidly equipped hospital at Wimer- And Shoeing Horses. ceux Works, two miles from the British base at Boulogne, and bas won for lier- The Women's Emergency Corps, self and eolleagues the recognition of Qrganized by the Aetresses Franchise theWar Office for the work of women Society, has a mem-bership of 15,000 wo- doctors in war-time. Until now Great men, each of whom is expert in some Britain alone amongst the allies bas line of useful work. There are licensed refused the help of women surgeons drivers of motors, taxi drivers, motor- This hospital unit was first estabýsh- cyelists, women who know everything ed in Paris at the beginning of the war. about a horse, even te the shoeing, and But when the Unes of comniunieation are ready and capable te ýtake charge of were changed part of the staff went to the remount departinent if the men their present quarters, Dr. Flora Mur- have te go te the front; women ray remaining in ebarge of the Paris gardeners who can instruct other wo- Hospital. men in the cultivation of the land in place of the men; a corps of signallers, Running Motors Also. despatch-riders te the government, etc., The London \"Globe,\" commenting etc. All these women are pledged te be tipon the work of these women, says: ready for service at any moment. \"The work being earried out with such Classes have rbeen organized by the remarkable saccess is admirable testi- N. S. te instruet the soldiers in French mony te their administrative ability.\" with volunteer teachers. Reading . The Scottish Pederation of the N. U. moins have been establiiilied aÙ over W. SA\" at a efflt of $30,000 has sent a the country in the vicinity of the camps, completeliogpital unit to France, whieh besides clubs for the soldiers' wives. ia settled nine miles from Chantilly, in A corps of a thonsand police wo- n beautifal country house, cbtained men ha8 been organized by the W. P. L. throngh the influence of Madame La fully trained in drill, signalling, flrst- Vîeom'tesse de la Panouse, President of aid, self-defence, proeedure and the the Red Cross of France. The bouse is ruleB of evidence in police courts, Énd moet suitable for the purpose, being collecting accurate detailed informa- commodious and having good drainage, tion as te the locality in whioh dutiois watér-supply and electrie lighting. are undertaken. Th ' e personnel of the unit, under Dr. There is also a mounted corps at- Ivens,_ of Liverpool, includes three taehed te this volunteer-foree. Tbase surgeots, two physieians, and an X-ray women are placed eh duty in a ublle operator, ten trained nurses, nearly as places and also are at the seuice -of man 1 y dressérs and orderlies, and two recognized socialýservice fioýieùe8, cooks--ail women. Two motor ambul- It bas béen émphasized by thi pro- ances and à motor car have beez given moterg et this pioneer work that it ha% by three women te serve the hospital. been nndertaken. in a spirit of eaxnest This unit is acting as a base hospital endesvor te serve in the prement time for the French f1ghting line from Noy- of national peril with the intention that on through Soissons te Rheims, The it shall become a permanent institution N. 1U. W. S. S. has sent two complete, with the confidence of the public end hospital iinits te Servia wmpôsed of the recognition of 'the Governmen.",
         "22 THE CANADIAN WAR. The Women's S. N. Aid Corps, organ- vital participation lu our National and ized by the W. P. L.P i8 using all the Imperial lïfe. rècognized outlets for women's ener- Sixty odd years ago the heart of a gies,1 and has multiplied them a llùnd- great woman was stirred witli a Càrist- red-fold, finding and creating work fer like compassion for thésuffering of the fheýunemployed, init,îating the industry men who obeyed the call of their ju. ËÉ«eand of màkiDg goft toys, feed- country. She braved the cruelty and ing the poor s chool children, and in tyranny of convention, and with a every direction providing ways anq little'hand of devoted women she open- means for those who need assistance. ed the way for the women of to-day, The Women's Emergency Corpi has ivho aTe proving their fitness and their been appointed the Government agency right to stand àide byside with the men to co-op 1 erate, with the Local Govern- of their country in its supreme ordeal. ment Board to càre for the 29,000 Bel- Did this great woman, wîth the courage g-lân refugees sent from, Holland to of a. lion and the shrinking tenderness of, mother-love, build better than she knew 7 or had she the, divine gîft of Aiey odd years ago Morénce, Night- ý,,i8iou and a splendid co Ildence in the ingàlê blazed the -way for women to a Power of women? THÉ SAILOR WHO WOULD MOBILIZE Talk of a Naveà Expert Who Ru Pought Apaches, of Whom Bill Flow Wu Pirst Afraid and Then Deflant, By U. N. C. DuDL Ey -J J'W OTJLD I want to go into that made it worth while. He assured the trenches?' she said, me that- he is a funne fellew, partly as if she ' was going to becanse he says what he thinks, and, fré âe, me. YOÙ 'bet 1 would. Pve 1 fancy,'partly because he does-.what beén there, before, and 1 didn't \u003e get he saye--especially when it 'éomes té kilied. But lym, teally a sailor, end shooting. He has foùght to kill aild I'm -humiliafýd that Im not wïth my bas killed, and his point of ýVieW hàs ship; right now. But Pm too.,old- point as well ais view. on for sixty-and, though 1 1 tell you whit it. à, \" he said,, .\" our MY papers on the first of ýep- women are the weak spot in this war. *' teMber, Im afraid they wont send 1 looéked at him, , deprécating his - gçt two autom ýéÉ M I've , aties in present style of fun'ninef3s-., ne looked 'fÉe,.tvardrdbe by ray -bed, loaded for straight back. Mer; and the eartridge belt is as full as \"Oh, yes,,I know what Iam talking it wiR bold. We are going to have about,\" he said. \"Last night at diný froubl6-4 don\"t know how, or where, ner one of- them said it was a shame e-:wheiý it.*iU come, but we're going to send good Canadian. 'boys bver, there ýtb'hý\" it, *âùd 1 d6n't give a \u003ehoot. to be; killed. 'What li\u0026d we to-do ýVîth Civlliàï,-,or Èo civilian, 1 ohàU shoot the it, -anyway ?_ - I asked her, 1 Whit \"uld MinutO T%èýe 16- snything to ýh,6ot it. \" you feel lilçe if the Germanà carde .1.ý.1rh. à ýý _t; - thé èld \u003e captain-a nat- here f', 'liral;llghtmg, man'. Ré sitfi in a fine 'Why,' she said, 'Id say,.',Hêre iý1hèe, tellïng bis und'erlinés whother -you are, Mr. German, the city -belong's tbOý are to imist.on euh mth order to you,' - What Oise could I ý dote Po 1 for such btuff afi'booka are plrinteil on. III tell you \", said the captaini whü -1 *e'jýt to' Wàkê hi* acquaîntance on.a wisheg he was' on his Whip looking fçS iiiitt\u0026 of creýitp and c=Pýom1seà on German submarines, III tell you. 1 lit easliý b6tôte delivèiy, with a diocount into her pretty hôtý even if it, was in",
         "THE CANADIAN WAKR 23 ,somebody else's house, and she was oneintesr; h erss o s of.-the prettiest women I have seen in idlgand'ethgs a long time. Bsds h etosm p- , I said, 'Do you know what wouldplar elyaaito-oi oth happen to you? You'd think to buy rs hti aigte. comfort by letting the Germans take Sae?1inrpltd everything. I'm not saying anything \"esi!sae;adsm ften about the patriotism of the sort of surý crdsif he oe nwwa fendler you pretend yan would make, fgtn tf hyv o nte i1 bat of your own safety. Do you know ala nete nesadta fte one of the first things that would hap- o'gethCerflwteohr pen? Along would come some German elw gthm.Ty' ikBly to your hu§band, and he'd say, 'Your lw, wife a pretty fine woman. You go Th atigzeouofhewn away from here and leave her to me,' IwanareisctsmlIikrd and before you'd know where youron ifaeThsmlgewnta were, my lady,' I said to her, speaking agsthcpaidrmehs guite plain, and before the crowd\"--neso h es.We etre and the captain spoke quite plain be- aani a osy fore me, too, and wound up -with the \" a e h o fagnnw remark that the pretty lady said noth-, ing when he asked her what she would sae tfdw ytesg-bs. tMink if her husband said to the in- We wstï,adhnsi 1 truder the equivalent of what'she had Fe eidtéSg-uh said about the city. I ainAzoan187Th Like the EugHshman. p:hshdbe adnadw ee The .captain threw himaelf half- sn u octho ilte.I a round in his chair, impatient and angry aht lzn fenoadw a at the recollection of the indifeérence encmledtta cv ith of th\" filne woman to the meaning of oe eidsm itesg-uhs the German menace to Canada as well oCrnt wsbhdoebutn as to Europe. ae om ih.BlyFe s 4Tell you what it is,\" he resumed, ab wnyyrd nm et h \"the peopje of this country haven't dcad1wr ut 'ffrte begun to wake up to what this war hd' enu.Btte a on means ·now, and still less have they iladwrpeeinhmfoa any idea of Mhat it is going to mean,fish ài or loue. Blywsfl eghotegrud I couldn't help replying, \"That's nglnhihe nttesad-Te exactly why The Canadia War wasbalt e pnigl rudhm started, captain. We don't profess to \" ewssae ssae ol e knot a tenth of what it involves for Atrawieh lofsbe o s this eomplaceut country, but we do 'odbe os hyl e n r know tha neither the average man on eogi the street nor the average man in the I-retosadhibtews average governnant-and we have ten sr hydgthmeeyso.Ad in the Domnn-eenses the magnitude b 4)te i.Able utgap of the erisis that face$ us.\"etecl fhs:lgjs nui esIaiet\" said ho, ehemently, \"oftigehmnp core teydosI*t realize TheCaa YuhulhveBnBi.ý dianÎleprety.uchlik th EnIM-secnd he. ste then he ries\" up o hi ium ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~~~\"eie, .TeEgin ô nw\u0026I g wyathe wpets on \"som peo- *47s~ ~ ~ ~~~~~ l area - reallyg afai -agr n ht af o to on upi tothe h4-nmgn%'bedisturbedris Hetha ù o.Btei fom hem. onâà1fPk sayngit.i-l e gtsa-goo sif kik e a ht itn they'veh go t thm ta",
         "24 THE CANADIAN WAR. thigh He rubbed the blood and leaped three or four governments. Do you to his feet. suppose that man realizes that this wa-r \"'Lie down, you damned fool,' I is hell economically as well as in its loss roared at him. 'They'll get you, sure.' of life and destrncti.on of the means of \" 'Not before I get one of them, the livelihood? sons of bugaboos,' yelled he, and with \"Then thera's another'clau of peo- that he stocrd up straight and pumped ple who really-think that we ought not 4'way at them as hard as he could go. 1 to get ready for war. By jiminy,ý I be- ealled again to him to get down, and lieve in armament. That's the only when he wouldn't I crawled over and way to bc safe. Safety first for mine. fairly pulled him. down. We have got to put two hundred thou- \"Well, in the end, we cleared out of gand men over the sea, and if that isn't there with nothing worse happening, enough we have, got to send more-- and Billy got scared no more. and then some more. \"Over in England two or three \"The Government, to my way of Zeppelins throwing bombs on London thinking, aren't alive to the real meau- would do them all the good in the ing of the situation. They won't let world. Something of the same kind men enlist in the militia regiments un- would do wonders for the fighting less they promise to go across the sea spirit of our own people. At present if required. That's all wrong. These we are not even on playing terms with fellows who have only the beginnings the war. \" of, fighting efficiency within them \"What would you do, then?\" said 1. should be got into the regiments. Get \"What would I do? I'd put the them in; put the uni-form, on them; let whole country under martial mobiliza- the spirit of the regiment and the sense tion inside of twenty-four hours, on of discipline get hold of them, and in the assumption that we are the front a little while they will be ready to go instead of being three or four thousand anywhere. 1' miles hýom the trouble. How else can \"We have got to find substitutes for you make the publie realize what this the bullet thât grazed Billy Plew's war meam 1 More and more men are ealli\" said I. beginning to make money out of it, \"You bet your life we have,\" said whieh tempts them to think it's a the captain, as he glanced at a paper pretty fine thing. brought in by a swift clerk. \" I came down this morning with a \"C.O.D.,'! he said with the decision man who, would have been down and of the quarter deck to the elerk. out but for the war. Ris factory's The clerk said, 1' Certainly, sir,\" and'l going night and day, fllling orders for took the hint and wrote a little cheqne, Anx YOUR BOOKSEMýER NUMBER ONE WANTED. If he la puahing rhe Canadien War.\" It la Numbers one and three of the Can- good busineu and good patriotism to create adian War are out of prïnt and are the démand. being enquired for, If you don't need yours kindly return to 32 Chureh St., At your patriotie meeting% concerto' Toronto. A subseriber partieulary de- lumbeons-wherever twe or three are gath. ires a dozen copies of No. 1. Ared tageMer--fiell 'ýThe Cana\u0026an Wae' and 9 take s0scriptions, Copies and advertialng matter euWied. Spread the flame and make ifffty per *mt. prodt for your local fund\u0026 Yeu eau subocribe for \"The Cans- *Write your requIrlements to 82 Church fiýtxeet. dian War\" any way you like, single We dont luidgtou cash with order. oMost ot copies, for a month, for thrse \u003eMbnths, MU, -We -WiMt to get in tqueh w1th yon. for six Months. single copies, 5 CenU;ý 25 cents for gve weelu; 65 oenta fe Aftqw tb.epmd-that 4 what The Can. a4lan Wàr la inunded to b\u0026 So pau it en; tbree montb;, $1.25 for Mx. mmU»ý and tell the othîr Pémon to do: lÏkud». 32 Ohurch St, Toronto.",
         "Don't Bother ME About the War: 1 Have Paid--m Yes, of course, you have paid. So have we all. But we are not through paying. Read, and think, and think. ' The Minister of Finance says we are only at the begin- ning of our sacrifices. So, whatever you have paid (and it inay look bigger now than it did when the first tide of generosity invaded your heart), IT HAS ONLY BEEN A PAYMENT ON ACCOUNT. The war will go on bothering you, whether you want to be bothered about it or not. We are not children, to turn our faces to the wall when the season of trouble strikes. We have paid some: we have got to pay some more. Heaven aIone knows all that is involved in this paying. .We know enough to make it most important that all who bear the Canadian name shall get together and stay together, In what we think, as well as in what we do. Effective doing depends on effective thinking. We can't see much of one another. We can't even talk to each other over the phone. The Canadian War comes around as a sort of Telephone Thought Exchange. You can get on to the line for the price of a talk over the wire down town; or in the store at the corner. And one thing about it is that every nickel spent this way goes to create employment that would otherwise have been unem- ployed. The Canadian War is the only war publication altogether made in Canada. It is an entirely new industry. The ideas you read are written by writers who are not paid eve-n for the paper they use. They are the contributions of patriotic men and women to the national and imperial cause. They have paid all they can afford. They cant afford to write for nothing; but they are doing it glaffly; and will go on doing it, so long as there is the will in the Canadian people. to sustain the service. So come along now and spread the gospel of Canada's. war., Send In a dollar subscription for yourself and for as many more as you would like to feel the way you do about r part -in the war, which the keeper of the Canadian National pursé says *iII demand more and more paying on the part of all of us, Something more on amount, thaVs all.",
         "q. AT THE END OF THE WAR Pormug -and Peophecy About the Re-arrangement of Europe Wbich, Muot Be Auured by a Durable Peace, Which Will Preserve Ger. many While Destroying Feudal Militarism, BY BENJAMIN A. GOULD L . T RE time bas come to consider By far the most important political what muet be done at the end event since the outbreak of hostilities of the war to make peace was the protocol entered into by Great a lasting jone. There is, of course, Britain, France and Russia, This pro- only one possible outeome to the war toeol contained two distinct provisions, which the world eau tolerate. Ger- and in the popular mind the fact that many and her allies must be compelled the first was more striking hua over- to a peace whieh shall not be threat- shadowed the deeper import of the. ened by the menace of =il-itariom, and second. ýý-îhich shall. make, all Europe free from First, it was provilded th-at no one of conscription, as the Àmericas, are free. the parties to the agreement would When two or three years of the best make peace without the consent of the part of the life of every young French- other two. This makes it certain that man, German and Russian are no the Triple, Entente will win the war. longer required for military service, By this the knell 'of the Naiser was this reliefwill go fat towards paying rung, as the Kaiser himself knows. the enormous cost of the war. And Temperance oi Wisdom. when the non-productive expenditureb Seeondly, it was provided that uo on guns, fortresses and navies are les- one of the parties, in making peaee, sened by many hundreds of millions would demand terms not satisfaetory ,of dollars annually, the saving will pay to theý other two. This makes it cer- the interest on a huge volume of war tain that the peace will be a lasting ,bonds. No peaee-can. bc economieally one. By this the knell of Kaiseriàrri permitted which doés pot provide for was rung; but whether the Kai him- both of these great reforme. self has the vision to understan it is Portu=te In dur Edwarit. verydoubtful. No greed on the part The world is fort=te in having at of any vietor shaU 5e allowed to im this time the unselfieh and clear-minded pose conditions so, bitter that in the services of Sir Edward Grey, for to the nature of things they eau be 'but tem- world, even in greater degree than to porary. The temperance of concerted G.reat Bibitain, must these services be wisdom, dominated by the temperance, given. IE% character and the lustory of Grey, will have to prevail. -of hâ statesmanship make - it clear that The world -neede Germany and eûn- he reco, nizes this world g= -duty. pot afFord. to see lier destroyed. But. Of the great men of to-day-Joffre, this Germany that must be preserved L the telial)Ie - Kitchener, the organizer, not the Germany of to-day, but the Gra4d Duke Nieholasi the brilliant; AI- Germany of to-morrow and to a cer- bert, the inspiration;, and Grey, the tain extent of yesterday'; not the Ger- statesman-Grey is the most valuable many ofthe mailed fi-st and blood and .,and would be thé hardest to replace. iron,,-býut \u0026I thrift and intelligent làor Whèfi Uùeolù àwas miirdeted, it waà and »agntilfte.Production; the Germany -truIý saidýthaè in him the Confederaey, that helps, -to, live not thit àôiamo to loat ito oettest' Mehd. Eveli 80, at dé\u0026th. the ýnà -of the *aï the people et Ger', . 'f cult Pér'à generation it-will ibe. dià inaDY have -in the vision of -Sir, to get f.air treatment foi- the people of tlieir greatest \u0026sset. Germany;. and foi a genemtion there sems little doubt butýthtt'he kîll bé nýon thMé \u003eoýIb a bfflen of i-rill d«ýdnat-e tlie making of pence, PRY-Ment which will be, hard to liégr.",
         "THE, CANADIAN WAR. 27 Th.ese things . ar-e inevitable. that at the end of the war there, will, bc Thé mi ions who have suffered deep 'th th' no problein of what to do, wi personal loss froin the wàr, to whom Kaiser, If lie is still. living, if neither during the war the very naine of Ger- disease nor suicide nor assassination inany has been anathema, cannot for- have' already ended his career, nothing gçt and cannot lightly forgive. There niustbe donc which may make,,of hira w \u003eIl be a legacy of hatred tow-ard the legendary martyr. individual, a failure -to recognize that St. Helena is entirely . obsolete. lie the individual is the victim, not the may bc safely left ta the people whom cause, of conditions which have been he has deceived. Ta one of his tempera insuffersble. ment the knowledge of his colossal fail- 'Unquestionàbly Germany, and the itre will bc far more 'bitter than any feudalisin that rules her, was directly other punishment which a civilized peo- responsible for the w-ar; equally un- ple could inflict upon Min. questionably Germany, once the war The inevitaible loss of his empire and was afoot, has been flghting for lier the end of his dynasty will bc the hea- very existence as she is now consti- viest burden that can be laid upon tuted. It is impossible to expect that him. the mass of her people should differ- now Will the Kaiser End? entiate 'between the false Germany whieh must cease to exist -and the true Personally, I'do not expect t1iat lie Germany which is entitled ta their will survive the collapse, of his country, loyalty. but I believe lie will meet death at his own hands, if he does not suffer it at Maso Cannot Differentïate. the hands of one of his dupes. 1 Every instinct of their nationalisrn, What of the territory of the con- every impulse of their training, every quered nations? Undoubtedly it will bar of their national tunes has urged be trimimed ta suit newer conditions. them ta support the Government whieh France will get back ýher ravished they have never been allowed to dis- provinces. . Alsace and Lorrain - will euss or ta eritieize as happier PeOPles again be French, and the statue of have been allowed to criticize freer Strasbourg, in the Place de la Con- Cioverjiments. corde,-will doff lier mourning. This is \", The very qualities of courage and all the European territory that France efficiency whi-ch will make these Ger- will acquire. It is merely.the restora- mans valuable ta the world, once theïr tion ta the owner of the prope.1rtY point of view ceases ta be distorted, stolen forty-four years aga. have now made:them a menace ta the But there are other fitolen,.properties world. Only when the outcome of the whiDh will alsoi have to, be restored. war is clear to, them will they begiii Heroïe Belgiuln will azise greatèr than question the leadership whieh before, and Aaehen will again become brought it about.' Aix-la-Chapelle. Even thiough the Beeause for a generation there has Seandinavian countries shall ibe able to been no, free press in Germ-any, Prus- remain neutral ta the end,,Denmiark siainiam has been able to make the peo- will Probably get back the Schleswig- ple see red, and until they cease te sec Holstein that the great European tilief red they cannotbe expeeted ta bc dis- stole from -her futy years \u0026go. loyal ta their Kaiser. But once the With this restoration WÎR have tê be ,time cames, as coma it must,,when de- coupied nome provision in regard tothe faat and invasion clear thairý vision and Niel Canal, whieh . @hall make . it ger tb;ey theinwVes - soe the fawne\" 0 F ýGV« --noutral and no. longer 4'InenaQe their godo, then will they \u0026IBO appre- ta thé W-Orlcl. Il, as 9ftMO probable, ejate, the value ol the political e.volu something like a federetion 'beentab- tlon whleh will entitle. them tb their lished of the three SSndinovian kWe plage lu *eý\".eietY of -p_4tio1ýâ- dome, it io.likely thatýto. them,-neer Thi,« brings. u*_ ta the, considerggen proper guarantees from ail1he, 'gréat",
         "28 THE CANADIAN WAR, pôwers, may be entrusted the gateS of Germany. lt may not follow immedi- the Baltie, both th:èough the Cattegat ately on the heels of peace, but it is and through the Kiel Canal. sure to eome as a result of the war. So much for Western Germany. In A temporary government made up thé eakt, the old Poland will be re- of duchies and kingdoms mýay be es- ereeted. as au autonemous unit in the tablished, but it will only be to prepare Rumdan Empire, and East Prussia, as the way for a Vereinigten Stauten voii far as the mouth of the Vistula, will Deutschland. Then and then only willi beeome a part of it. This new Poland it be safe for the world to forget that will, of course, also comprise Galicia, the Teuton is a Hun. oin the south. Turkey will cease to exist. The timF When we come to consider the has come for the Sick Man of Europe Austre-Hungarian Empire, the ques- to die, and his death wîll extend to tions of division become mueh more Asia also. The Ottoman Empire has oomplicated and difficult. This em- long been au anachronism, and now is pireold and great as it has been, will the time when \"Finis\" must be writ- cease to exist. For many years it has ten. been an unnatural and artificial strue- A British Caliphate, Perhaps. ture, and it will fall absolutely to The ownership of Constantinople pieces. Europe will at last'be free of willbe the hardest thing to decide. 11apsburgs, as it willbe free of Hohen- There isno question 'but that; Russia zollerns. ought to have it. Gan Russia be trusted Around the BaUrans. to have itl I believe that this will be Bukowina will become Russian, the best solution, and that the Dardaii- Transylvania will go to Roumania. elles muât bc in Russias immediatc The endeavor mu-st be made to draw charge, -under guarantees of perpetnal the 'boundaries aecording to racial neutrality. populations, so that the units may bc The greaiter part of whàt remains of as homogeneous as possible. The part Turkey in Europe wiR probably g to of Hungary which is Magyar will prob- Bulgaria, including Adrianople. Of ably be made au independent nation- T urkey in Asia a strip along the Blaek a limited monarchy or a republie. Sea from the Caneasue should aecom- Bosnia and Herzegovina will, of pany Russia's ownership of the Straits, courSe, beeome Servian, with possibly so that she shall have land access to Slavonis, Croatia and Dalmatia. Trieste, the Bosphorus. The rest of Asiatie with the Trentino, as well as Albania, Turkey might weR be ereeted into a will ibe Italian, and the Adriatie will Caliphate ' under British protection. bécome an Italian lak-e, with trading Germeny will bc stripped of all-the rights assured for the seaports of foreign possessions whieh she has so Servi\u0026 and Môntenegro. signally failed to ad-minister suecess- All that is Germanie of Austria fully. The greater part of them will go xhould become, a part of the new Ger- to, Great Britain , not so much beeause many. Many districts which are at Great Britain needs the colonies asbe- present not at ell German in sym. cause the colonies need Great Britain. pathies are none the less probably The Çape to Cairo railroad will be al] racially sufficiently German to be red. France may receive some addi- safely eonstituted into German etaites. tional Africau tetritory, as - may aloi Por this in the destiny of Germany, to Belgium, for whým nOthing will be too U a confederation of states, proïbably good; but Ahica will beeome emene- rgubHeau in forým of governmexit, each ally Brittah, exce.pt along the. Mediter. fffl and- equal auff relié*ed of Prus- ranean- ùin d0iùýtî0U. The German islands in the Pacifle As UdUtary :dhmteft twice bred a wlU (bu Britlahý KitoChow will ho ni Preneh. repiiýUe no wM Ue downfall Japanéee pouesalon -'but If Japau is wq of Kaiseriam Pug about 'a republican Wise U 1 believe h'er to ýbe, ghe will",
         "'£ÏiL' CANADIAN WAU, 29 restore it to China very shortly after for the destructio-a wrought in Poland. the war. Nothing else that she could Japan alâo eau show her magnan- do would give lier such prestige or éio imity to the world by demanding no entitle lier to a place among the leaders money. of the world. There reinains the question of arma- .No other act could so eonfound those inents. All of the German and, Aus- who cry of the Yellow Peril and see trian dreadnougâs and ships of the Tokio fighting San Francisco. Such line which have not been transformed unselfishness would repay Japail a hiiii ilito \"unter see booten\" inust go to dredfold for what it cogts her. Britain. The world mue trust Britaili In the matter of money indemnities, to, guard the routes of trade until there the sums -which the beaten countriês shall ýbe un international navy to do eau pay are, of course, limited. Turkey this international job. The history of can pay nothing. She is bankrupt aud the last hundred years proves that th-ýý must go through ingolvèney. The World will be Rafe in so trusting Bri- hîghest amount whieh can 'be wrung tain. out of what remains of Germany and The Krupp works must be destroyed, Austria-Hungary after the trimmings except in so far as they are suited to already mentioned. will not exceed ten the needs of peace. Such of the border -billions of -dollars, and may not bc mor-ý fortresses as have not been destroyed -than half of this. must be demolished; those of Germany Not a shilling must come to- Great und\" compulsion; those of thevictors voluntarily. The fact that they have Britain. Her greatness denies that - 1 she may take money pay for what she kroved of little use against modern has done. siege artillery will make the nations Belgium must be given all the monev more ready to do this. needed to restore lier so far ais moue Finally, the boundaries established .y must be guaranteed by every great cm restore-probably one and a half power; each of whom must bc bound to billion dollars. prevent with force of arms, if need be, France must have back the ransom any violation or forcible alteration of whieh Germany robbed her'of in 1871, firontiers. If every great power is with good heavy interest, and also an bound by scraps of paperi which will indemnity for the destruction of her hereafter -have more weight than in the northern provinces. It may take two past, to protect each guaranteed fron- and a ýhalf or threc billion dollars to tier, even as Great Britain protected pay theý bill. Belgium, national usurpation of real Servia and little , Montenegro will estate will cease. ,.,...also have to be paid; perhaps three If these things are brought about, a8 quarters of a billion for the former they can bc brought about, by the war, auà fwo hundred and fifty million for it will not have (been fought in vain; -fhe latter. and Tommy Atkins, Jean Franeoiis and 'Éussia should bc great enough not to Ivan Ivanoviteh will deserve very well demend. money, although abc could of the world for whieh they have suf- ,hardly 'bc Wamed if she sought to be fered and died. It is ohie:fly up to Sir re-imhursed for part of heroutlay and Edward Grey to justify thpir deaths. Goldman, Toronto. Tou cm subscribe for \"The Cansi- 1 enelose,$1, being fort*o i4Uérip- dian Warl' any way you like, single tioin to your, patH'otiè and - excellent copiei, for a month, for three montba, publicepn, iý ý oh, gppeË4 to me, -as for six months. Bingle copies, ô omts; being entitled to tlie support of every 25 oents for Ave weelu * 65 conte for -Britishér. - With best-wisbes for tàe Un-06 Mntho\", $1.25 for six Months, sueem ý of ayery patriotie undertsking 82 Ohmh K, Téýonto,",
         "$HALL WE- -COUNT. IN THE PEACE.?, Canada, Being a BelIHIgereutL.It Broadin Out, and Consider Whether She Shall Rave nv%, When. th-..e P'em Io Arçangod. BY MAIN JOHNSON Substance of an addrese on 11Cý and tion in such. au enterprise, whieli the Allies\" to the Canadian Club of North might almiost ýbe ealled a-Holy Crusade, Bay; cannot help but have an inspiring and look ahead into the future, to tonie effect on the whole moral fabrie make plans for the time to cOme, of the country. does not reduce the efficiency- In the second place, this w-ar means of to-day's work, but rather leads to emphatieally Canada's broadening ont, greater intelligence in the prosecution her deflni.te entrance on the stage of of'the most pressing duties. It is for world affairs. In this eonflict Canada this reason that even now, when we iLý re is assoeiated not only with lier col- in the midst of a serious erisis ; and leagnes in the British Empire, but with when we. must decide what is best to the other allies as well, w , ith France for be done every single day; and when, instance, and with Belgium and, Rnssia. beyond everything, Germany must be Canada, in faet, is one of the Allies bggten, it is nevertheless worth while herself. This viewpoint incroases our to ëonsidPýr so -me of the questions whieh i nterest in the straggle, deepens our ipervitably will arise in the future. sense of respousibility, and broadens 1 ý9any people. are wondering what the our national horizon. world will be like when at last the We are ilinked up not only with such war is over, and are imagining ideal reconstructions of governments and comparatively old friends as France ,territorial boundaries. The very im- and Belgium., but we suddenlyfind our- pulge of thiB idealism, ihay help t'o bring selves ýco-operating in the samé stu- fo pass some of the good things whieh 1)endous enterprise with Russia, one of tiow seem. but as dreams. Canada's ne,ý oor-neighbore--by -the ea, but one in whom our inter- In the saine way, it is 4uite legiti- est hithert 1 ô has been slight. Already mate to ask such a question as -thiz, we are haàtening to hear authorities on \"Should Canada 'bc represented at the Russia, such as Professor Mavor, Pre- reace settlement at the end of the fessor Snow, Mr. Armstrong and Prof. war f \" The discussion of such a point Ilarper of Chicago Univ\"ty. should help us realize the fundamentai basis of Canada,'s relations with the We are taking an interest in the ý,rait'ûf the . world, and aiso the real simple, Christian-spirited, common peo- ati,11 ffiel of Russia and in'i ts vivacidus mid. ýdgýniflean-ce'oi Canadaýs particp o -atthe saine t' in the -wDrId-wi(lé struggle. dle classes, anà ime are Without glorifying war for 1 its own enlarging our knowledge of Rusfijan Wa.ke,,,or trying to minimize the awful_ art and Russiàn polities. ppsg ot, on'ê- of the most terrible thiùgs Týosé - who favor Canada'à recogili- this ývor1d- knows, there is neîther tion in the final Péaee Conferences, not neýesàîîty noireaffon for utter pessim- merely throngh the rePregentatives of 18m. There are at jeast gome Kood by- Great Bri-tain, but by her own individ- Pnduets of the wari ual spokesniân, - sitting, . naturalky PQr9ne thing,ý our people are, firm ïn ý e-110ugh Ive similar repreSntatives the -Wid, that canada in fighting on froni Vie other, Uâtions oe theBrit4h ýhe, bide ýof 1ïiýht, Emp1reý give as one of their arguments for the sa»crednesà of thàt tlië pledgo'd 'Word, for'thé -defenee 6f gWee C4nada really Je one 01 the týe-- weak, and die perpe tùa'tio'n' 01 'Aliliàsý this- PAI-Meipgtion \u003c w6uld.. offteial- Pglitical and inaral ideals 'l \u00264-1;iaiid ioWn#.. ïg tbé of whieli thisi w.i\u003erld.:know,#. ýPartfe1pa- (Contiiinéd-, 011 page 82.1",
         "Miss Merrill's Appeal for Belgian,- Relief Xiss Ileleu Marin's thanks to sub. number. scribers to The Canadian War, for Ralf of subscriptions sent to *[ïss money received thrbugh the paper, and Merrill, c-o The Canadian. War, will go her appeal for further au pport, was to the Belgian Relief Fund of the El received toc late for insertion in this Loyaliste; THUNDER BAY AND THE BELGIANS Report of the Belgian Relief Commitiee at Fort William from the Bel- gian Consulate, District of Thunder Ëay - John King, Vice-consul. il . - One carload of 410 bags of flour, citizens Donation from MLnutcipality of 1ýepIgo n, of Fort rfflIligm and Port.Arthur. $25. Oùe carload of 4010 bags of flour, citizen$ Donation fromRassport,,for Rice, $83.60. of Fort Frances. Donation from Ignace, by J. Denby, $14.60. One carload of 400 bags of flour, citizens Proceeds of concert at Keewatin, $68. of Renom Proceeds of potatoes sold by City of Port Two tons of rice, apecial donations, citi- Arthur, donated by farmers of district, $50.45. zens ofRôsfflrL Donation fmm Murillo Methodist Sunday 'One hundred agd nine cases of goodi have Sých00I 8\u003c!glîylars, $26. been ÉhiDped, Includlnig apecial Items. john,,Klng, expenses lu connectioli with One carload of new elothinz, blankets, transportation of troupe, secretary, etc., $45 boots, groïcerles, etc., donated by Messrs, OMrien, McDou-gall \u0026 O'Gorman, value, as per invoices, $2,700. pour cases of new clothing (mens), shoes, FROM THE NORTH COUNTRY., etc:, donated by Mr. MoDbugan, Pori Arthur, Ont, and valued at 41,000, as per Invoices. Despite the cosmopolitan character et the Twelve cases ef new and secondhand population In Northern 'Ontario and the fact clothIng and blankets from ettizens of Fort that the ratio of unô=Ioymeaý thére It Franceo, Ont. much lower than In the remainder of t hé Nine cases oï elothing, new and second- band, fraià citizens of KenorýL. province, there bas always 'been a piethora Irwo tages, of clÔthing, new and second- af recruits . ba\", from eltizens of Emo ($200). When recruits were called for the second ozke'eue of '010111ing, new and- Becond. contingent three hundred men mustered hand, from eltizens oi Keewatin. from the north ai Sudbury. Twéýhundred of 0jýe trunk of elothIng, 'new and second- them were sent back home, sInce only', one band, from friends. hundred could be eQuipped and taken. Many Tliîtty-dve pairs new festhiar pfilows, from of these men bave given up thoir Jobs to go, citimens or Kenora. and when they returned were ont of work Twenty-tour cases mostly new and second- for some time. 'b\"d clothIng, blankets, boots and shoes, That was not.veryconduelve to recruiting, groceriez, etc., from citizons of Fort William but If gny spécial appeai were made' hun- and Port Arthur. dreds more could be obtaineà at a fe* e . omplete ouUts or layettes for liourslilédée. WhenýXiJor Eddie.ýRolliàdiý bâbles, and 25 ontilte for inDther,#.,withali V.C., sought 45 men for his aiutomoU«-bat- neýessary. artièleslor the cases. 'Goodl3 to. téry.he wasiflooded wlth aPelicatIons ýb .03n make lâiktes *ere boutht with procoeds of the best youth of the munýti7. \"d ho h\" series ôf Ô*nýerts given by S't. LukWsSoýW Sent 'badk to Ottava 4'5 of the hardblt.- Cliibý under the direction of L. W. Hallett, ten', etardy gr(D\u0026poetors the North bas pro- groas ratelpts belng. Fort William, one »er- dwe known on everF trail for the Past five forSance, Orpheum, 1818; Port Aithur, 6âe years, many bÏtbbiji skllfed iiièôhanicé and portormaneg, Ieceum, $95; Pôrt Frana\", 0,11- -of them, lightning quick4n an emergency. hnmpettormances, Opéra llouu,, $800. Of tuese men ý the . great; nlajôïity hâNç tir Willlam 'Màmkonzio, Cý95L- fteo tralis- joine trùm au Innate libve bt letrife *fth ti9jr ýoîîàt1où 01 tr*àDe or 24 plaiers, Port LVU. ÔÉ N\u0026tUrè, àn(Ja.heâéd 0 f the hUedftM Utë liàlÊ to Fort Vranc4s ez-d ratura, to ýwhých they -M no,« em'dý=ed,- 9ncý Donaton trom unattIpaRty or NepIgon, thelr proopeotbg occupation Ima gonez but Rome few %av$ golle troin a senge of dufý.",
         "THE CANADýAN WAR, (Contfnued from page 30.) formin-g. the 1\u003eitannic Alhanoe..' war and in any settlement whieh may -. This phase - \" The Brftannie AM. resùk. ance,\" iS a reminder. of'the man..ýVhG ThOY BRY that^ te play sueh a rôle hl\"' £é1ped to make it current, Richard ,wouM be good for Canada as it would JObb. Quite recantly . this %glish develop and emphasize stiù mûre, Can- Publicist has advocated, the holdinirof ada's international responsibilities, a 9. preliminary conférence of the-=. development necessary for her permaný tions of the Empire at whieh the Do- ent stalbility and greatness. minions eould diseuss with Great Those Who do not favor the idea, or Britain, what stand,, ehould be taken nt who 'believe it is impira-etieable, main- the Peace Settlement. It is not the intention of. the writer tain that Canada, with aH her courage to Say- which of these many views. is and good will, cannot have enough fighting men actually- on the fleld of correct. The question is too funda-. battle to entitle her to be recognized mental te. be settled - dogmatieally, by- anY one man or any groupof opinion. separately at any settlement, and that The problem is prmnted, however, feà Canada will have to be- content to be iëh 'lies at the ro ta of oiÏr represented by Great %tain. one whi 0 lWo Sides ue Bore. foreign relations. Carry New World XdeaL Others say that, even if Canada Whether or not Canada will be reprë7 should be permitted to have snob. an n sented in a Peaee Conferenee, this envoy it would not 'be wise poliey to much is sure, Canada lhas a valuàble send olne, but that for the best interests contribution ta make to any discussion bath of Canada and the Empire at on international polities and -the. re-.'. large, it would 'bc preferable to have lation bétween men of différënt natioW, the aPPointments made by the British îýHties. Not.as a neutral, but as one ôÉ Foreign Office. They elaim that the the belligerenta herSýCý she = b * foreign problem of the Empire. is, in ring, ito esgentials, one and Indivisible, and among the warring, nationt the N ew, Worid ideal of Peace, and the Ne# the it would bc upwise to allow local World éxperiment of Points 01 view to interfere with a nationality. Canada within her o-vm central opinion exPressng the.n8eds 01 bordera has, noi a few., \"but. thousàuds Great Britain and the Empire a,4 0 of -former citizens of the nations, et war, on both aides. ne contenders on the opposite \u0026ide Canada, in faet, ie herself a wor.ldýýin of the argument answer that this miniature, and n6t a véry amâli would -be an excellent opportunity to miniature at that. In sucha- cap\u0026ýî1f demonstrate the unique eharactel- of she should be gble to help materiall the Britierh Empire, by having itg c,«ý y in the search for a satishwtory and.: list. stituent parts represented eaeh by its ing peaee. If she dôAs li- 1 t a tmse own envoY. This would be a convine- either diredly or indireeZ, 'theà0, not. ing example of au empire organization hy any favontism, nôt. by, any fortune whieh bas PrOved itself workable and of birtà but, frolà the.. wisdom. gained elfldênt, andYOt which at the unie in the Îziý of he OYMý'expc\u003erience, glie fime leaves perfeet freedom of action will have perf r r.eil And- A.nd 1ýP1iOY if need hé, te the nations peîmanent Mr the ý,wù Y«, ma ýiMbà«1bë ler l rhe The illuotrations préparM for glis di= war,, any YOU fte 111=15er were éto*ded. ont to make **es, fqk a ý=ntb, fot theee, 7, moïn lot, ,,,The \u003e! WÙR ÀPpýèâl CI: et Oft wbulu. oingk.OOP4 fr=0 ud ' Bewum, Nè# wéiek tim 25 mU for nve'vieb;, 68 cenu fw: ME",
         "Are, , ý in A Th ny A, Ministeriàl:Associati-n Belgiau RÉI mittee OddfeUowf4 àoà Overse\" ûlub P iainen eess S'W la îôù Pýtr!ot Society R Cross Sooléty Som 01 England. AISSôc!atWný Sone of geotland, ty ý$onS -of Tiainperaluee ndr ý's Sýýet ltël,9'ôf 4110.1 mere Sti Gýeûirg:ê,» Soeiety.i singlè Tax Assodiation Teacheirs' As sociat\" Râme eý nird Town -CôiýxSiI TMè Uùion TowaShip ûôuùell\": Ok W. c T: iu Y*-X ù!ÏIý-X. are 'lit par 1, Patjýn, ie \"eelletmedil, Oa4«d4Iý tieï e w8w e*eýý r bif T41, Ji ...... .....",
         "jw PtAin1g, 149 IWO ý ÏM âz, lt 1 71 e, xe, el lie"
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Toronto : publisher not identified, [1915]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Weekly"
      ],
      "title" : [
         "The Canadian war. : Fifth Number (January 30, 1915)"
      ],
      "type" : "document"
   }
}
{
   "doc" : {
